North Carolina statutes. Chapter 1C. Enforcement of Judgments.
Article 18. North Carolina Foreign Money Judgments Recognition Act. [Repealed]

§§ 1C-1800 through 1C-1808.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2009-325, s. 1, effective October 1, 2009, and applicable to all actions commenced on or after that date in which the issue of recognition of a foreign-country judgment is raised.

Cross References.

For present similar provisions pertaining to the North Carolina Uniform Foreign-Country Money Judgments Recognition Act, see

G.S. 1C-1850

et seq.

§§ 1C-1809 through 1C-1819.

Reserved for future codification purposes.